Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF COTTAGE GROVE; SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the TH 61/80th Street Rehabilitation Project from Highway 61 to Ideal Avenue South as a primary connection to Highway 61 in the city of Cottage Grove are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after March 31, 2026, and before January 1, 2028. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after March 31, 2026, and before January 1, 2028. new text end